Louisiana, session 2026, SB183.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart FF of Part II-A of Chapter 1 of Subtitle I of Title 39 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 39:100.271, is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
SUBPART FF. RESERVE FUND
§100.271. Reserve Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Reserve Fund, hereinafter referred to as the "fund".
B. Any money transferred, donated, or appropriated to the fund by the
legislature shall be deposited into the fund.
C. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-302 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 183
the fiscal year shall remain in the fund. The monies in the fund shall be invested
by the state treasurer in the same manner as monies in the state general fund.
Any interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund shall be credited
to the fund.
D. Monies in the fund shall only be withdrawn subject to an
appropriation by the legislature.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature of the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.